Washington statutes.
RCW 32.32.245

Public statement authorized.

If it should become essential as a result of rumors prior to the adoption of a plan of conversion by the applicant's board of directors, a public statement limited to that purpose may be made by the applicant.

[ 1981 c 85 s 48.]